Wyoming statutes. Title 11 Agriculture, Livestock and Other Animals
Article 1. In General

§ 11-19-101.
Duties
of state veterinarian generally; failure to comply with provisions;
penalty.

The state veterinarian shall investigate all cases of dangerously contagious or infectious diseases among domestic animals in this state which are brought to his notice. In the absence of specific information, he shall make inspections of any locality where he has reason to suspect there is any contagious or infectious disease. He shall order that all animals affected with, exposed to or suspected of being affected with such diseases be gathered and quarantined. No animals pronounced affected with a dangerously contagious or infectious disease by the state veterinarian or his deputy or agent shall be turned loose, removed or permitted to escape, but shall be held subject to the order of the state veterinarian. All animals ordered gathered shall be gathered within a reasonable time specified by the state veterinarian.

The state veterinarian may inspect, treat, test, vaccinate, quarantine or sell any animal imported into Wyoming in violation of W.S.

11-19-111

or any rules promulgated thereunder.

Any person failing to comply with this section shall be punished as provided in W.S.

11-1-103

.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 41, § 2; R.S. 1887, § 4200; R.S. 1899, § 147; C.S. 1910, § 192; Laws 1917, ch. 41, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 203; R.S. 1931, § 109-1103; C.S. 1945, § 56-201; W.S. 1957, § 11-279; W.S. 1977, §

11-22-101

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1981, ch. 98, § 2; 2011, ch. 96, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to duties as a member of wildlife/livestock disease research partnership, see §

11-19-602

.

The 2011 amendment,

added (b), and redesignated former (b) as (c).

Laws 2011, ch. 96, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2011.

Cited

in

Peterson v. Wyoming Game & Fish Comm'n, 989 P.2d 113,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 166

(Wyo. 1999).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Governmental Immunity from Damage Actions in Wyoming — Part II,” see VII Land & Water L. Rev. 617 (1972).

For article, “Bison, Brucellosis, and Law in the Greater Yellowstone Ecosystem,” see XXVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 1 (1993).

§ 11-19-102.
Duty
of public to report diseases; list of reportable
diseases; failure to comply or obstruction of duty; liability; penalties.

Any person or government entity who knows or suspects that there is any contagious or infectious reportable disease among animals owned by or under their jurisdiction or any veterinarian who knows or suspects any reportable contagious or infectious disease on any premises or in any animal, shall immediately report the same to the state veterinarian. The state veterinarian shall establish and manage a list of reportable diseases for any contagious or infectious disease deemed by the state veterinarian to be a threat to domestic animals. During development of this list the state veterinarian shall consult with the Wyoming game and fish department’s supervisor of veterinary research services. Information collected in response to the list of reportable diseases shall be considered confidential proprietary information. Access to any information collected under the list of reportable diseases shall be limited to the person who reported the disease and the state veterinarian, except that the state veterinarian may at his discretion notify any of the following:

The Wyoming livestock board;

The state veterinary laboratory;

The Wyoming game and fish director only if the disease threatens wildlife;

Any state or federal inspector, public health official or peace officer who is actively involved in the investigation of an outbreak or suspected outbreak of the contagious or infectious disease;

Owners of possible contact animals;

Adjacent landowners; or

Local area practicing veterinarians.

The state veterinarian when he deems it to be in the best interests of animal health, or the state public health officer when he deems it to be in the best interests of human public health, may release to the public any information collected under subsection (a) of this section, except the identity of any individual who reported the disease or whose animals may have contracted the disease.

A failure to report, or any attempt to conceal the existence of the disease or to willfully or maliciously obstruct or resist the veterinarian in the discharge of his duty is a misdemeanor. Any person who willfully or maliciously falsifies a report to the state veterinarian is guilty of a misdemeanor. Any person convicted of any of the above acts or omissions shall be punished as provided in W.S.

11-1-103

.

Any person who knows that they own or have in their possession any livestock as defined by W.S.11-20-101(a)(iv) infected with any disease formally declared by the Wyoming livestock board, through rule and regulation, as being potentially economically devastating and for which there is a valid diagnostic test and who transfers ownership or possession of the livestock to another person, or who knowingly or through his own neglect allows the livestock to commingle with uninfected livestock, is liable for the economic damages caused by the spread of the disease to uninfected livestock. In addition to the conditions for liability and recovery set in subsection (e) of this section, damages shall be available under this subsection only to a transferee who accepts the diseased animal directly from the liable person and to the owner of an animal that becomes infected as the result of direct contact with the diseased animal. The burden of proving liability and damages under this section shall be upon the person claiming damages. Any person who files a claim for recovery under this subsection alleging facts known to be false is liable for three (3) times the damages caused by the false claim and reasonable attorney fees.

No person who has received written notice that an animal is infected with a disease identified in subsection (d) of this section prior to acquiring ownership or assuming possession of the infected animal shall be entitled to the damages provided by subsection (d) of this section. No livestock sales or auction facility shall be subject to the liability imposed by subsection (d) of this section if:

The existence of disease was not reported to the facility and the facility did not know of the existence of the disease; or

The facility provided written notice of the disease to the person claiming damages under subsection (d) of this section.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 41, § 8; R.S. 1887, § 4206; R.S. 1899, § 153; C.S. 1910, § 198; C.S. 1920, § 209; R.S. 1931, § 109-1110; C.S. 1945, § 56-206; W.S. 1957, § 11-280; W.S. 1977, §

11-22-102

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1981, ch. 98, § 2; 2005, ch. 16, § 1; 2008, ch. 41, § 1; 2013 ch. 50, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2005 amendment

rewrote the section, to require the state veterinarian to compile a list of reportable contagious or infectious diseases, to provide for the confidentiality of information except as provided, and to provide for a penalty for maliciously falsifying a report.

Laws 2005, ch. 16, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 17, 2005.

The 2008 amendment,

added (a)(vii) and made a related change.

Laws 2008, ch. 41, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2008.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added (d) and (e).

§ 11-19-103.
Quarantine of diseased animals generally; treatment, testing
and vaccination thereof; effect of failure to obey order of state
veterinarian; appeal; stay of action.

In all cases of infectious and contagious disease among domestic animals in this state, the state veterinarian may order the quarantine of the infected premises. If the disease becomes epizootic in any locality in this state, the state veterinarian shall immediately notify the governor who shall issue his proclamation forbidding transfer of any animal of the kind among which the epizootic disease exists from the locality without permission from the state veterinarian.

Whenever the state veterinarian finds any infectious or contagious disease among domestic animals in any section of the state he shall take such steps as will prevent the spread of the disease. The state veterinarian may inspect and compel the treatment, testing, vaccination or quarantine of all such animals in Wyoming found to be infected or exposed to the disease or imported in violation of W.S.

11-19-111

or any rules promulgated thereunder, under such rules and regulations as he may adopt. Any order or regulation made by the state veterinarian is subject to review, modification or annulment by the board at any subsequent meeting.

and (d) Repealed by Laws 2011, ch. 96, § 2.

If the owner or persons in charge of animals ordered treated, tested, vaccinated or quarantined after reasonable notice determined by the veterinarian, fail to treat, test, vaccinate or quarantine such animals as ordered, the veterinarian may seize or cause such animals to be seized and treated, tested, vaccinated or quarantined and may hold and sell the animals, or part thereof as necessary to pay all costs of inspection, seizing, caring for, treating, testing, vaccinating or quarantine together with cost of sale. The sale shall be made at the time and place and in the manner prescribed by the veterinarian. Not less than three (3) days nor more than fifteen (15) days notice of the time, place and purpose of the sale shall be given by the veterinarian to the owner or persons in charge of the animals, by personal service within the county in which the animals are being held if possible, and if not possible then such notice may be given either by personal service outside of the county or by advertisement in any paper selected by the veterinarian. The state veterinarian shall only sell the animals after all other remedies have been exhausted.

The owner of animals so seized and held may at any time prior to sale recover possession of the same by paying to the state veterinarian the amount of costs incurred by order of the veterinarian against the animals. Any sum realized from the sale of the animals over the cost actually incurred against the animals shall be returned to the owner of the animals if known or can by reasonable diligence be found. Otherwise the overage shall be placed in the estray fund and dispensed as provided by law.

Any order or other action under this chapter may be appealed by the owner, or the agent of the owner, of the animals affected or by any aggrieved governmental entity to the board as follows:

The appeal shall be requested within thirty (30) days of the order or action, except that a quarantine may be appealed at any time during the quarantine;

An informal hearing may initially be requested. A formal hearing may subsequently be requested and shall be conducted as a contested case in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. The board shall render a final decision in writing within ten (10) working days of the conclusion of the hearing;

The board may alter, amend, annul or otherwise modify any order in the event the board finds:

The aggrieved person was injured by the order or regulation; and

The state veterinarian lacked legal authority for the order or regulation; or

The order or regulation was not needed to:

Protect the public health;

Prevent the spread of animal disease;

Preserve the ability to market Wyoming livestock efficiently; or

Implement a specific requirement of Wyoming law.

All decisions of the board are subject to judicial review under the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

In the event of a foreign animal disease outbreak, an act of animal agro-terrorism or other animal health emergency, the state veterinarian shall have all of the resources of the livestock board at his disposal. When such an event occurs, the state veterinarian shall immediately notify the governor and shall advise him as to any additional resources which may be needed to address the emergency.

Any person failing to comply with this section shall be punished as provided in W.S.

11-1-103

.

The owner or producer of animals quarantined for brucellosis containment efforts may submit a claim at any time during the quarantine, or within thirty (30) days after release from quarantine, for reimbursement for actual expenses incurred in mitigating or attempting to mitigate the effects of the quarantine. The Wyoming livestock board, in consultation with the state veterinarian, shall promulgate rules for the processing of claims under this section.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 41, § 3; R.S. 1887, § 4201; R.S. 1899, § 148; Laws 1909, ch. 60, § 10; ch. 164, § 2; C.S. 1910, §§ 193, 2691; Laws 1911, ch. 96, § 1; 1915, ch. 107, § 3; 1917, ch. 80, § 1; C.S. 1920, §§ 204, 3200; Laws 1921, ch. 60, § 1; ch. 71, § 1; 1925, ch. 54, § 1; 1927, ch. 6, § 1; R.S. 1931, §§ 67-1410, 109-1105; C.S. 1945, §§ 56-202, 56-404; W.S. 1957, §§ 11-282, 11-450; W.S. 1977, §§

11-22-104

,

11-27-103

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 2007, ch. 191, § 1; 2011, ch. 96, §§ 1, 2; 2013 ch. 12, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2020 ch. 94, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

Cross references. —

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act, see § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

The 2007 amendment,

in (b), inserted the last sentence; and added (g) and (h).

Laws 2007, ch. 191, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2007.

The 2011 amendment,

in (b), rewrote the second sentence which formerly read: “As a sanitary measure, he may inspect and compel the dipping, spraying, or other treatment of all such animals in Wyoming found to be infected or exposed to the disease, under such rules and regulations as he may adopt”; repealed former (c) and (d), which read: “Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (b) of this section, no person shall be required to dip ewes with lambs between April 15 and July 1, but all ewes with lambs infected with or exposed to any infectious or contagious disease must be held in quarantine, separate from sound sheep. The owner of ewes with lambs held in quarantine during the above period of exemption is required to spot and hand dress animals showing symptoms of any infectious or contagious disease, and the state veterinarian or his agent may enforce such treatment and recover the cost thereof as provided by law for treatment at any other time of the year. (d) Where sheep must be dipped in the immediate vicinity of the quarantine and the owner fails to provide suitable facilities for dipping, the state veterinarian or his agent may prepare such dipping works at the expense of the owner. If the sheep cannot subsist on range forage until they have been treated, the state veterinarian shall provide feed at the owner's expense”; in (e), rewrote the first sentence which formerly read: “If the owner or persons in charge of animals ordered treated, after reasonable notice determined by the veterinarian, fail to dip, spray or otherwise treat such animals as ordered, the veterinarian may seize or cause such animals to be seized and dipped, sprayed or otherwise treated, and may hold and sell the animals, or part thereof as necessary to pay all costs of inspection, seizing, caring for, dipping, spraying or other treatment together with cost of sale,” and added the present last sentence; and added (j).

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, in (a), substituted “epizootic” for “epidemic” and “epizootic disease” for “epidemic”; and substituted “animals” for “livestock” in (e).

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, added (k).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Validity of provisions. —

Chapter 164, Laws 1909 (§§

11-19-103

,

11-19-105

), was not invalid as an unlawful delegation of power
to state veterinarian by conferring certain powers upon him for purpose
of stamping out or preventing contagious disease among domestic animals.
Arbuckle v. Pflaeging, 20 Wyo. 351, 123 P. 918,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1912).

Police regulation. —

Statute providing for inspection of sheep and quarantine of infected animals is essentially a police regulation, and power thereby conferred upon sheep inspectors is not inhibited by constitution. Richter v. State, 16 Wyo. 437, 95 P. 51,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1908).

Former provisions requiring compulsory dipping of all sheep within state, whether diseased or not, under inspector's supervision and state board regulation was proper exercise of the police power. State v. Hall, 27 Wyo. 224, 194 P. 476,

1920 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1920).

§ 11-19-104.
Slaughter of diseased animals; authority of veterinarian; slaughtering
order; when consent of owner required.

In any case of epizootic disease where premises have been previously quarantined by the state veterinarian, he may order the slaughter of any diseased animals upon the premises and all animals that have been exposed to contagion or infection under the following restrictions:

The order shall be in writing with a duplicate for each owner of the animals condemned;

The original of each order shall be filed by the veterinarian with the governor and a duplicate given to the owner; and

Before slaughtering any animal that has been exposed only and does not show disease, the veterinarian shall have the consent of the owner or person in charge of the animal to be slaughtered.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 41, § 4; R.S. 1887, § 4202; R.S. 1899, § 149; C.S. 1910, § 194; C.S. 1920, § 205; R.S. 1931, § 109-1106; C.S. 1945, § 56-203; W.S. 1957, § 11-283; W.S. 1977, §

11-22-105

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 2013 ch. 12, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “epizootic disease” for “epidemic disease” in (a).

Cross references. —

As to disposing of cattle infected with tuberculosis or Bang's disease, see §

11-19-214

.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Bison, Brucellosis, and Law in the Greater Yellowstone Ecosystem,” see XXVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 1 (1993).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Constitutionality of statute or ordinance providing for destruction of diseased animal, 56 ALR2d 1024.

Officer's liability for killing or injuring animals, while acting, or professing to act, under a statute in relation to the inspection or destruction of livestock, 2 ALR3d 822.

§ 11-19-105.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2012,
ch. 90, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1882, ch. 41, § 5, related to slaughter of diseased animals, condemnation by veterinarian, burning of carcass and payment of expenses.

Laws 2012, ch. 90, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2012.

Validity of provisions. —

Chapter 164, Laws 1909 (§§

11-19-103

,

11-19-105

), was not invalid as an unlawful delegation of power
to state veterinarian by conferring certain powers upon him for purpose
of stamping out or preventing contagious disease among domestic animals.
Arbuckle v. Pflaeging, 20 Wyo. 351, 123 P. 918,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1912).

§ 11-19-106.
Removal
of diseased animals; owner's claims.

All claims against the state arising from the ordered disposal of animals by the state veterinarian for scrapie, brucellosis and tuberculosis, together with the order of the veterinarian, shall be submitted to the state auditor who shall examine them without unnecessary delay. For purposes of this section, “disposal” means to sell, send to slaughter or destroy the animal. For each claim he finds to be equitable and entitled to indemnity under this chapter the auditor shall issue his warrant on the state treasurer for the sum named in the claim. All claims for indemnity arising under the provisions of this chapter, before they are presented for payment to the auditor, shall be submitted to the state veterinarian who shall fully inform himself of the facts connected with each claim. The state veterinarian shall endorse on each claim his approval or rejection and shall express in such endorsement the reasons for his approval or rejection.

If the state veterinarian rejects a claim it and the reasons for rejection shall be submitted to a board of arbitration consisting of three (3) members selected as follows:

The state veterinarian shall select one (1) stock grower who is a resident of the county where the ordered disposed animal for which the claim is made ranged;

The claimant shall select one (1) stock grower who is a resident of the same county; and

These two (2) shall choose the third member from among the stock growers of the same county.

The indemnity granted under this section shall be the difference between the fair market value of the livestock and the amount received for the sale, less any amount of reimbursement provided for and paid under federal law and regulation. Fair market value shall be determined by using comparable sales data from state markets at the time of removal or by the use of a qualified independent livestock appraiser as designated by the state veterinarian. If no sale is transacted, but an animal is removed for diagnostic purposes or disposal, the reimbursement provided shall be the fair market value minus any other reimbursement. Unless otherwise reimbursed, the cost of shipping or transportation and commission charges shall be added to the amount provided to the producer for livestock indemnification. It shall be paid to the owner upon his application and presentation of proofs prescribed herein within six (6) months of the date of ordered disposal for which payment is claimed. The claim shall be barred if not presented within the time limited.

Payments shall be made by the state treasurer from funds appropriated to the animal reimbursement program account under W.S.

11-19-118

and as provided by W.S.

11-19-109

. The right to indemnity is limited to animals destroyed by reason of existence or suspected existence of some epizootic form of infectious or contagious diseases, generally fatal or incurable.

There is no right to indemnity and payment in the following cases:

For animals belonging to the United States;

For animals that are brought into the state contrary to the laws of this state or the governor’s import proclamation;

For animals found to be diseased upon arrival or that were exposed to the disease prior to their arrival in the state under circumstances whereby the Wyoming owner knew or should have known of such conditions;

When an animal was previously affected by any other disease which from its nature and development was incurable and necessarily fatal;

When the owner or person in charge has knowingly or negligently omitted to comply with W.S.

11-19-104

or

11-19-105

; or

When the owner or claimant at the time of coming in possession of the animal knew it to be diseased or received the notice specified in W.S.

11-19-110

.

The Wyoming livestock board, in consultation with the state veterinarian, shall promulgate rules and regulations for the processing of claims under this section.

[Renumbered as §

11-19-118

by Laws 2020, Ch. 94, § 2.]

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 41, § 10; 1886, ch. 85, §§ 1, 2; R.S. 1887, § 4208; R.S. 1899, § 155; C.S. 1910, § 200; C.S. 1920, § 211; Laws 1921, ch. 70, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 109-1112; C.S. 1945, § 56-208; W.S. 1957, § 11-285; Laws 1973, ch. 199, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

11-22-107

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1991, ch. 114, § 1; ch. 174, § 2; 2012, ch. 90, § 1; 2020 ch. 94, §§
1, 2, effective July 1, 2020.

Cross references. —

As to payments to owners for destruction of swine affected with hog cholera, see §

11-19-113

.

As to payments to owners for destruction of cattle infected with tuberculosis or Bang's disease, see §

11-19-214

.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, in (a), substituted “ordered disposal of animals by the state veterinarian for scrapie, brucellosis and tuberculosis” for “slaughter of animals,” and added the present second sentence; substituted “ordered disposed” for “slaughtered” in (b)(i); rewrote (c), which read: “The indemnity granted shall be the fair market value of the livestock as determined by the department of agriculture. It shall be paid to the owner upon his application and presentation of proofs prescribed herein within six (6) months of the date of slaughter for which payment is claimed. The claim shall be barred if not presented within the time limited.”; and added (f) and (g).

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (c) deleted the first two sentences, which read “Prior to the state veterinarian endorsing any payment be made for the ordered disposal of any livestock under this section, W.S.

11-19-214

or

11-19-406

, the state veterinarian shall ascertain that sufficient funds are available. The state veterinarian shall utilize available federal funds prior to state funds to pay the owner of the livestock” and substituted “indemnity granted under this section shall be” for “indemnity granted shall be”; and in (d) substituted “funds appropriated to the animal reimbursement program account under W.S.

11-19-118

and as provided” for “funds appropriated as provided”; and redesignated (g) as W.S.

11-19-118

(a).

Editor's notes. —

Section

11-19-110

, referred to in subsection (e)(vi), does not contain a notice requirement.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Bison, Brucellosis, and Law in the Greater Yellowstone Ecosystem,” see XXVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 1 (1993).

For case note, “Wildlife — Private Property Damage Law — Once Upon
a Time in Wyoming There was Room for Millions of Cattle and Enough
Habitat for Every Species of Game to Find a Luxurious Existence. In
the Aftermath of Parker, Can We All Still Get Along?
Parker Land and Cattle Company v. Wyoming Game and Fish Commission, 845 P.2d 1040,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1993),” see XXIX Land & Water L. Rev. 89 (1994).

§ 11-19-107.
Auditor to pay claims allowed by board; effect of failure to submit
claim to board.

The state auditor shall
pay no claim for indemnity which is rejected by the state veterinarian,
unless it has been submitted to arbitration and the arbitration board
decided it to be legal and just. If any claimant refuses to submit
his claim rejected by the veterinarian to a board of arbitration,
the refusal is a waiver of all claim for indemnity.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 85, § 4; R.S. 1887, § 4210; R.S. 1899, § 158; C.S. 1910, § 203; C.S. 1920, § 214; R.S. 1931, § 109-1115; C.S. 1945, § 56-210; W.S. 1957, § 11-286; W.S. 1977, §

11-22-108

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

§ 11-19-108.
Compensation of board.

Each member of a board
of arbitration shall receive
one hundred
dollars ($100.00) for each day actually engaged and
employed in the investigation of any claim, paid by the state veterinarian
out of an appropriation for that purpose.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 85, § 3; R.S. 1887, § 4209; R.S. 1899, § 156; C.S. 1910, § 201; C.S. 1920, § 212; R.S. 1931, § 109-1113; C.S. 1945, § 56-209; W.S. 1957, § 11-287; Laws 1974, ch. 16, § 2; W.S. 1977, §

11-22-109

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 2013 ch. 12, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “one hundred dollars ($100.00)” for “five dollars ($5.00).”

§ 11-19-109.
Limitations on indemnity.

The liability of the
state for indemnity for animals destroyed under this act [§§

11-19-101

through 11-19-117] in any two (2) years, is limited by and shall in no
case exceed the amount especially appropriated for that purpose and
for that period.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 41, § 12; R.S. 1887, § 4212; R.S. 1899, § 159; C.S. 1910, § 204; C.S. 1920, § 215; R.S. 1931, § 109-1116; C.S. 1945, § 56-211; W.S. 1957, § 11-288; W.S. 1977, §

11-22-110

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Bison, Brucellosis, and Law in the Greater Yellowstone Ecosystem,” see XXVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 1 (1993).

§ 11-19-110.
Quarantine of diseased animals; authority of veterinarian over animals
in transit.

The owner or person having in charge any animal affected with or suspected of any contagious or infectious disease shall immediately confine the animal in a safe place, isolated from other animals, and with all necessary restrictions to prevent dissemination of the disease until the arrival of the state veterinarian.

The state veterinarian or his agent may examine all animals passing through the state and on detection or suspicion of disease may take possession of and treat and dispose of animals in transit in the same manner as animals resident in the state.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 41, § 9; R.S. 1887, § 4207; R.S. 1899, § 154; C.S. 1910, § 199; C.S. 1920, § 210; R.S. 1931, § 109-1111; C.S. 1945, § 56-207; W.S. 1957, § 11-289; W.S. 1977, §

11-22-111

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to establishment of a food safety system, see §

35-7-123

et seq.

§ 11-19-111.
Regulation of importation of animals; prohibited acts; penalties;
applicability.

The governor, upon recommendation of the Wyoming livestock board, may regulate by proclamation the importation into Wyoming from any other state any animal, blood, microorganism or biologic agent capable of causing any disease affecting livestock or other animals, or any other item suspected of being infected or contaminated with biologic agents capable of causing animal disease, except under such conditions as he deems proper for the protection of the livestock, livestock animals as defined in W.S. 11-29-101(a)(vi) and other domestic animals of Wyoming. All requirements in the governor’s proclamation shall be enforced by the Wyoming livestock board.

After a proclamation is issued by the governor it is unlawful for any person to import into Wyoming or receive imports within this state from any other state any animal, blood, microorganism or biologic agent capable of causing any diseases affecting livestock or other animals, or any product or item suspected of being infected or contaminated with biologic agents capable of causing animal disease, except under such conditions as may be imposed by the proclamation. Any person who violates this section shall be punished as provided in W.S.

11-1-103

. The violator is civilly liable for all damages and loss sustained by any person by reason of violation of the proclamation.

The proclamation authorized by this section shall not prohibit the transportation of animals through Wyoming by railroad as long as the animals are not unloaded in this state.

The state veterinarian may inspect, treat, test, vaccinate, quarantine or sell any livestock or other domestic animals imported into Wyoming in violation of W.S.

11-19-111

or any rules promulgated thereunder. Any order or regulation made by the state veterinarian is subject to review, modification or annulment by the governor or the board at any subsequent meeting.

An order of the state veterinarian under subsection (d) of this section shall be subject to appeal and due process as provided in W.S.

11-19-103

.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 41, § 7; R.S. 1887, § 4205; R.S. 1899, § 152; C.S. 1910, § 197; Laws 1917, ch. 40, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 208; R.S. 1931, § 109-1109; Laws 1939, ch. 11, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 56-205; W.S. 1957, § 11-290; W.S. 1977, §

11-22-112

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1981, ch. 98, § 2; 2011, ch. 96, § 1; 2013 ch. 12, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2011 amendment,

added (d) and (e).

Laws 2011, ch. 96, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2011.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, in (a) and (b), substituted “animal, blood, microorganism or biologic agent capable of causing any diseases” for “livestock, or any virulent blood or live virus of any disease,” “item” for “thing,” and “biologic agents capable of causing animal disease” for “livestock disease germs”; added “or contaminated” in (a) and (b), “livestock animals as defined inW.S. 11-29-101(a)(vi) and other domestic animals” in (a); and “or other domestic animals” in (d).

Governor's proclamation constitutional. —

The governor's proclamation, issued pursuant to this section, did not constitute an unconstitutional delegation of legislative authority to the executive branch and did not burden interstate commerce. Mendicoa v. State, 780 P.2d 1346,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 206

(Wyo. 1989).

No conviction for transporting cattle through state. —

The defendant's convictions on two counts of “importing” livestock into Wyoming without valid health certificates, in violation of this section and the governor's livestock import proclamation, were reversed, where the evidence showed that the cattle were transported through the state of Wyoming to Kansas or Oklahoma, and were never intended by defendant to be held, used, consumed or enjoyed in Wyoming or incorporated into its general mass of property. Mendicoa v. State, 780 P.2d 1346,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 206

(Wyo. 1989).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Bison, Brucellosis, and Law in the Greater Yellowstone Ecosystem,” see XXVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 1 (1993).

§ 11-19-112.
Cooperation with animal and plant health inspection service.

The state consents to
having the
animal and plant health inspection
service (APHIS) of the United States department of agriculture
and its employees come within Wyoming for all purposes connected with
the importation and exportation of diseased livestock and for all
purposes connected with the eradication, suppression and control of
dangerously infectious and contagious diseases of livestock.

History.

Laws 1917, ch. 100, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 219; R.S. 1931, § 109-1120; C.S. 1945, § 56-213; W.S. 1957, § 11-292; W.S. 1977, §

11-22-114

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 2013 ch. 12, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “animal and plant health inspection service (APHIS)” for “bureau of animal industry.”

Cross references. —

As to appointment of federal veterinary inspectors as deputy state veterinarians, see §

11-18-111

.

§§ 11-19-113 through 11-19-117.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2013, ch. 12, §
2.

These sections, which derived from Laws 1909, ch. 60, § 9; Laws 1969, ch. 42, § 1-4, related to the destruction of swine to control hog cholera and liability for damages caused by quarantine.

§ 11-19-118.
Animal reimbursement program account.

There is created the animal reimbursement program account into which shall be deposited revenues as provided by law. Interest on earnings from funds in the account shall be credited to the account. Deposits into the account shall only be expended pursuant to this section, W.S.

11-19-103

,

11-19-106

,

11-19-214

,

11-19-406

and Wyoming livestock board rules. Notwithstanding W.S.

9-2-1008

or

9-4-207

, unexpended funds shall not revert.

The state veterinarian shall report the balance of the account and the claims endorsed and paid each fiscal year to the joint appropriations committee and the joint agriculture, state and public lands and water resources interim committee.

Before the state veterinarian endorses any payment to be made from this account for the ordered disposal of any livestock under W.S.

11-19-106

,

11-19-214

or

11-19-406

or for brucellosis testing and containment efforts pursuant to Wyoming livestock board rules or under W.S.

11-19-103

, the state veterinarian shall ascertain that sufficient funds are available in the account. The state veterinarian shall use available federal funds before using state funds to make any payment from this account.

Not more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000.00) shall be paid for any single quarantine effort under W.S. 11-19-103(k). The reimbursement limit under this subsection does not include any indemnity payment for livestock disposal under W.S.

11-19-106

,

11-19-214

or

11-19-406

. Payments from this account for quarantine efforts shall cease whenever the unexpended, unobligated account balance equals or is less than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00). Payments from this account for quarantine efforts may resume after the unexpended, unobligated account balance exceeds one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00).

The Wyoming livestock board, in consultation with the state veterinarian, shall promulgate rules to carry out the purposes of this section.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 41, § 10; 1886, ch. 85, §§ 1, 2; R.S. 1887, § 4208; R.S. 1899, § 155; C.S. 1910, § 200; C.S. 1920, § 211; Laws 1921, ch. 70, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 109-1112; C.S. 1945, § 56-208; W.S. 1957, § 11-285; Laws 1973, ch. 199, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

11-22-107

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1991, ch. 114, § 1; ch. 174, § 2; 2012, ch. 90, § 1; Former Wyo. Stat. §

11-19-106

was renumbered to be

11-19-118

, by Laws 2020, ch. 94, § 2, effective July 1, 2020.

Effective date. —

Laws 2020, ch. 94, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2020.